Nebraska, session 109, LB805.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB805 LB805
2026 2026
Section 1. Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, (a) any individual or
group sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or subscriber
contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any
hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for short-
term major medical policies of six months or less duration and policies
that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-benefit
coverage, and (b) any self-funded employee benefit plan, to the extent
not preempted by federal law, shall include coverage for cranial helmets
for infants up to one year of age to treat deformational plagiocephaly or
craniosynostosis.
-2-